Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0148.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 22224d. (1) A person that is seeking to initiate, expand, replace, relocate, or acquire 1 or more of the following services for the purpose of providing the services through an outpatient imaging center may file a letter of intent with the department before beginning the initiation, expansion, replacement, relocation, or acquisition of the service, instead of obtaining a certificate of need: (a) A positron emission tomography scanner service. (b) A fixed or mobile magnetic resonance imager service. (c) A fixed or mobile computerized tomography scanner service. (2) Not more than 30 days after receiving the letter of intent under subsection (1), if the department verifies the services will be provided through an outpatient imaging center, the department shall send a written acknowledgment to the person approving the initiation, expansion, replacement, relocation, or acquisition of, for purposes of providing an outpatient imaging center, 1 or more of the services listed under subsection (1). (3) A person shall not initiate, expand, replace, relocate, or acquire a positron emission tomography scanner service, a fixed or mobile magnetic resonance imager service, or a fixed or mobile computerized tomography scanner service under this section without a certificate of need unless that person receives a written acknowledgment of approval from the department under subsection (2). (4) As used in this section: (a) "Facility fee" means a fee imposed to cover the cost of operation of the facility and not the cost of the service provided. (b) "Outpatient imaging center" means a facility in which imaging services will be provided, that is not owned or operated by a person who owns or operates a hospital, and that does not use a facility fee.